Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.270

Unlawful to refuse assistance in establishing identity and ownership of livestock.

It is unlawful for any person moving or transporting livestock in this state to refuse to assist the director or any peace officer in establishing the identity and ownership of the livestock being moved or transported.

[ 2003 c 326 s 32; 1959 c 54 s 27.]